Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 133.870 is amended to read:
133.870. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 192.311 to 192.478, a law enforcement  agency may not release
a booking photo except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A law enforcement agency may release a booking photo described in  subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) To the person depicted in the booking photo;
(b) To another law enforcement agency, or to a law enforcement  officer employed by another
law enforcement agency, for a law enforcement purpose;
(c) To the public, if  the law enforcement agency determines that there is a law enforcement
purpose for the release,  including but not limited to assistance with the apprehension of a fugitive
or a suspect in a criminal investigation, or the identification of additional criminal activity;
(d) To a state mental hospital upon the admission to the  hospital of the person depicted in the
booking photo;
(e) To a party  in a criminal proceeding resulting from the arrest during which the booking photo
was obtained;
(f) To the victim of the offense for which the person depicted in  the booking photo was arrested;
(g) To the court, if the booking photo is part of a pretrial release report or is provided to the
court as part of the pretrial release  process for the purposes of confirming the identity of a de-
fendant; [or]
(h) To an investigator licensed under ORS 703.430; or
[(h)] (i)  Upon the conviction of the person depicted in  the booking photo, if the conviction re-
sults from the arrest during which the booking photo was obtained.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Booking photo” means a photograph of a person taken by a  law enforcement agency for
identification purposes when the person is booked into custody.
(b) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.915.
(c) “Law enforcement officer” means an officer, deputy, member or employee of  a law enforce-
ment agency.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 993 (SB 993-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 993 (SB 993-INTRO) Page 2